Washington statutes.
RCW 10.66.060

Bond or security.

A temporary off-limits order or a one-year off-limits order may not issue under this chapter except upon the giving of a bond or security by the applicant. The court shall set the bond or security in the amount the court deems proper, but not less than one thousand dollars, for the payment of costs and damages that may be incurred by any party who is found to have been wrongfully restrained or enjoined. A bond or security shall not be required of the state of Washington, municipal corporations, or political subdivisions of the state of Washington.

[ 1989 c 271 s 219.]